src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
noperiod ;
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Sg+Dat+Def:%-нтень # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen+Def:%-нть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Gen+Indef:%-нь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Lat+Indef:%-в # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Nom+Def:%-сь # ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-back ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Sg+Dat+Def:%-нтень # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen+Def:%-нть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Gen+Indef:%-нь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Indef:%-со # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Def:%-сонть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ela+Indef:%-сто # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ela+Def:%-стонть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Lat+Indef:%-в # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Nom+Def:%-сь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Prl+Indef:%-га # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Prl+Def:%-ганть # ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-front ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Sg+Dat+Def:%-нтень # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen+Def:%-нть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Gen+Indef:%-нь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Lat+Indef:%-в # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Indef:%-сэ # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Def:%-сэнть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ela+Indef:%-стэ # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ela+Def:%-стэнть # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Nom+Def:%-сь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Prl+Indef:%-га # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Prl+Def:%-ганть # ;

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.

! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
+ABBR:%. # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+N+ABBR:%. # ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.


! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! The ones without final period are listed first. They do not
! need the transitivity division.

LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON noperiod
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
млн ab-nodot-noun-back ;
млрд ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ААНИИ ab-nodot-noun ;
АЗС ab-nodot-noun ;
АККОР ab-nodot-noun ;
АМР ab-nodot-noun ;
АНО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
АО  ab-nodot-noun ;
АПК ab-nodot-noun ;
АПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
АПС ab-nodot-noun ;
АРЕ ab-nodot-noun ;
АсПУр ab-nodot-noun ;
АССК ab-nodot-noun ;
АССР ab-nodot-noun-front ;
АТК  ab-nodot-noun ;
АТОС ab-nodot-noun ;
АТС ab-nodot-noun ;
АФК ab-nodot-noun ;
АЭС ab-nodot-noun-front ;
БАМ ab-nodot-noun ;
БДД ab-nodot-noun ;
БК ab-nodot-noun ;
БКД ab-nodot-noun ;
БМВ ab-nodot-noun ;
БНР ab-nodot-noun ;
БРИЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
БССР ab-nodot-noun ;
БТР ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАД ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАСХНИЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВВС ab-nodot-noun ;
ВГТРК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВДК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВДНХ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ВЗУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВИАМ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВКСШ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВМП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВМФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВНИГРИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВНИИКП ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОИР  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОСВОД ab-nodot-noun ;
ВПП ab-nodot-noun ;
ВСНХ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВСХВ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВТО ab-nodot-noun ;
ВФЛА ab-nodot-noun ;
ВЦИК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВЦИОМС ab-nodot-noun ;
ВЧК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВЭБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГАИ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГАПОУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ГБОУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГБПОУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ГБУЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГДР  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГИБДД ab-nodot-noun ;
ГИМС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГИТИС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГК ab-nodot-noun ;
ГКУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ГлавПУР ab-nodot-noun ;
ГНЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГОМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГОСУКС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГПТУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГРО ab-nodot-noun ;
ГРПП ab-nodot-noun ;
ГРЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГСМ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГТО ab-nodot-noun ;
ГТС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГУК ab-nodot-noun ;
ГУП ab-nodot-noun ;
ГЦАС ab-nodot-noun ;
ДВП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДИНА ab-nodot-noun ;
ДК ab-nodot-noun ;
ДКИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДНД ab-nodot-noun ;
ДНР ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ДОСААФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДПД  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДПО ab-nodot-noun ;
ДПС ab-nodot-noun ;
ДРВ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДСК ab-nodot-noun ;
ДСПМК ab-nodot-noun ;
ДТ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДТП ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ДШИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЭУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЮСШ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЮШС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕГИСЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕГЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕС ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ЕТС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕЭС ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ЖКО ab-nodot-noun ;
ЖКХ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ЖЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЗАГС  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ЗАО   ab-nodot-noun ;
ЗИЛ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ИВЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ИГИЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ИД ab-nodot-noun ;
ИК ab-nodot-noun ;
ИМЦП ab-nodot-noun ;
ИП ab-nodot-noun ;
ИПККНО ab-nodot-noun ;
ИСУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ИТМО ab-nodot-noun ;
ИУУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ИЦВО ab-nodot-noun ;
КамАЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
КАПП  ab-nodot-noun ;
КАССР ab-nodot-noun ;
КбшЖД ab-nodot-noun ;
КВН  ab-nodot-noun ;
КГ ab-nodot-noun ;
КГПИ ab-nodot-noun ;
КИМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КИППТ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КИР  ab-nodot-noun ;
КМЕТ ab-nodot-noun ;
КНГ ab-nodot-noun ;
КНР  ab-nodot-noun ;
КНШ ab-nodot-noun ;
КП  ab-nodot-noun ;
КПДН ab-nodot-noun ;
КПП ab-nodot-noun ;
КПСС  ab-nodot-noun ;
КПУ ab-nodot-noun ;
КРАГСиУ ab-nodot-noun ;
КРБ ab-nodot-noun ;
КРИРОиПК ab-nodot-noun ;
КРОО ab-nodot-noun ;
КРТК ab-nodot-noun ;
КТ ab-nodot-noun ;
КУПНО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
КФХ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛВЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛДК ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛДПР ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛЗУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛНР ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ЛПО ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛСГ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛТП ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛУКОЙЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛЭП ab-nodot-noun ;
МАГАТЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
МАПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МАССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
МАФУН ab-nodot-noun ;
МБОУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МВФ ab-nodot-noun ;
МГИМО ab-nodot-noun ;
МГПИ ab-nodot-noun ;
МГПУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МЖКХ ab-nodot-noun ;
МИД ab-nodot-noun ;
МКД ab-nodot-noun ;
МКС ab-nodot-noun ;
МОД ab-nodot-noun ;
МОУ ab-nodot-noun ;
МПК ab-nodot-noun ;
МР ab-nodot-noun ;
МРМИИ ab-nodot-noun ;
МРО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МРОТ ab-nodot-noun ;
МРТ ab-nodot-noun ;
МСК ab-nodot-noun ;
МСП ab-nodot-noun ;
МССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
МТК ab-nodot-noun ;
МТС  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
МУК ab-nodot-noun ;
МФЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
МФЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
МЧС ab-nodot-noun ;
НА ab-nodot-noun ;
НАО ab-nodot-noun ;
НАТО ab-nodot-noun ;
НВХО ab-nodot-noun ;
НДС ab-nodot-noun ;
НИИ ab-nodot-noun ;
НИИУ ab-nodot-noun ;
НИОКР ab-nodot-noun ;
НК ab-nodot-noun ;
НКГБ ab-nodot-noun ;
НКСД ab-nodot-noun ;
НЛО  ab-nodot-noun ;
НП  ab-nodot-noun ;
НПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
НРБ ab-nodot-noun ;
НСПК ab-nodot-noun ;
НСШ ab-nodot-noun ;
НТМ ab-nodot-noun ;
НТС ab-nodot-noun ;
НЭП ab-nodot-noun ;
ОАР ab-nodot-noun ;
ОБЖ ab-nodot-noun ;
ОбОНО ab-nodot-noun ;
ОБХСС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОВД ab-nodot-noun ;
ОГИПТАД ab-nodot-noun ;
ОГПУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОДВФ ab-nodot-noun ;
ОК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОЛП ab-nodot-noun ;
ОМОн ab-nodot-noun ;
ОМС ab-nodot-noun ;
ОНО ab-nodot-noun ;
ООН  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ООО  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОПГ ab-nodot-noun ;
ОПС ab-nodot-noun ;
ОРВИ ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ОРС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОСП ab-nodot-noun ;
ОТФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОУН-УПА ab-nodot-noun ;
ОЭЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ПАК ab-nodot-noun ;
ПАТП ab-nodot-noun ;
ПГ ab-nodot-noun ;
ПДД ab-nodot-noun ;
ПечорНИУИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ПЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ПМЭФ ab-nodot-noun ;
ПРО ab-nodot-noun ;
ПСО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ПТУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ПФКИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ПФО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ПЭМФ ab-nodot-noun ;
РАН ab-nodot-noun ;
РАФУЖ ab-nodot-noun ;
РГД  ab-nodot-noun ;
РДДМ ab-nodot-noun ;
РЖД ab-nodot-noun ;
РК   ab-nodot-noun ;
РКП  ab-nodot-noun ;
РМ ab-nodot-noun ;
РНА ab-nodot-noun ;
РОНО ab-nodot-noun ;
РОСНАНО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
РПЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
РСДПР ab-nodot-noun ;
РСС ab-nodot-noun ;
РСФР ab-nodot-noun ;
РСЧС ab-nodot-noun ;
РТРС ab-nodot-noun ;
РФ   ab-nodot-noun-back ;
РФПИ ab-nodot-noun ;
РЦИ ab-nodot-noun ;
РЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
САПР ab-nodot-noun ;
СВО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
СД  ab-nodot-noun ;
СЗПК ab-nodot-noun ;
СКА ab-nodot-noun ;
СЛДК ab-nodot-noun ;
СМЗ  ab-nodot-noun ;
СМИ ab-nodot-noun-front ;
СНГ ab-nodot-noun-front ;
СОБР ab-nodot-noun ;
СП ab-nodot-noun ;
СПбГУСЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
СПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
СПСЧ ab-nodot-noun ;
ССО  ab-nodot-noun ;
СССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
СТО ab-nodot-noun ;
СУ ab-nodot-noun ;
СХПК ab-nodot-noun ;
США  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
СЭВ ab-nodot-noun ;
ТБО ab-nodot-noun ;
ТК ab-nodot-noun ;
ТКО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ТМХ ab-nodot-noun ;
ТОЗ   ab-nodot-noun ;
ТОСЭР ab-nodot-noun ;
ТСЖ ab-nodot-noun ;
ТЭФИ ab-nodot-noun ;
УБОП ab-nodot-noun ;
УГИБДД ab-nodot-noun ;
УЖД ab-nodot-noun ;
УИН ab-nodot-noun ;
УКС ab-nodot-noun ;
УНКВД ab-nodot-noun ;
УР ab-nodot-noun ;
УССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
УТ ab-nodot-noun ;
УФНС ab-nodot-noun ;
УФССП ab-nodot-noun ;
ФАДН ab-nodot-noun ;
ФБУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ФГКВОУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ФГУП ab-nodot-noun ;
ФИФА ab-nodot-noun ;
ФЛГР ab-nodot-noun ;
ФМБА ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ФОМС ab-nodot-noun ;
ФРГ  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ФСБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ФСС ab-nodot-noun ;
ХАД ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦВР ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦИК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦК  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ЦОПП ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦРУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦУКС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЧАЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЧОС ab-nodot-noun ;
ШВК ab-nodot-noun ;
ЭВМ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЭКО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ЮАР ab-nodot-noun ;
ЮЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON TRAB
досл ab-dot ;
А ab-noun ;
Б ab-noun ;
В ab-noun ;
Г ab-noun ;
Д ab-noun ;
Е ab-noun ;
Ж ab-noun ;
З ab-noun ;
И ab-noun ;
Й ab-noun ;
К ab-noun ;
Л ab-noun ;
М ab-noun ;
Н ab-noun ;
О ab-noun ;
П ab-noun ;
Р ab-noun ;
С ab-noun ;
Т ab-noun ;
У ab-noun ;
Ф ab-noun ;
Х ab-noun ;
Ц ab-noun ;
Ч ab-noun ;
Ш ab-noun ;
Щ ab-noun ;
Ъ ab-noun ;
Ы ab-noun ;
Ь ab-noun ;
Э ab-noun ;
Ю ab-noun ;
Я ab-noun ;
Ё ab-noun ;
а ab-noun ;
б ab-noun ;
в ab-noun ;
г ab-noun ;
д ab-noun ;
е ab-noun ;
ж ab-noun ;
з ab-noun ;
и ab-noun ;
й ab-noun ;
к ab-noun ;
л ab-noun ;
м ab-noun ;
н ab-noun ;
о ab-noun ;
п ab-noun ;
р ab-noun ;
с ab-noun ;
т ab-noun ;
у ab-noun ;
ф ab-noun ;
х ab-noun ;
ц ab-noun ;
ч ab-noun ;
ш ab-noun ;
щ ab-noun ;
ъ ab-noun ;
ы ab-noun ;
ь ab-noun ;
э ab-noun ;
ю ab-noun ;
я ab-noun ;
ё ab-noun ;
